South Dakota, session 2026, HB1120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-12A-44 be AMENDED:
32-12A-44. No person may drive or be in actual physical control of a commercial
motor vehicle while there is between 0.04 and 0.08 percent or more, by weight of alcohol
in that the person's blood at the time, or as measured within two hours of the time, of
driving or being in actual physical control of the commercial vehicle, as shown by chemical
analysis of that the person's breath, blood, or other body substance. Any A violation of
this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Section 2. That § 32-23-1 be AMENDED:
32-23-1. No person may drive or be in actual physical control of any vehicle while:
(1) There is 0.08 percent or more by weight of alcohol in that the person's blood at
the time, or as measured within two hours of the time, of driving or being in actual
physical control of the vehicle, as shown by chemical analysis of that the person's
breath, blood, or other bodily substance;
(2) Under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, marijuana, or any controlled drug or
substance not obtained pursuant to a valid prescription, or any combination of an
alcoholic beverage, marijuana, or such controlled drug or substance;
(3) Under the influence of any controlled drug or substance obtained pursuant to a
valid prescription, or any other substance, to a degree which that renders the
person incapable of safely driving;
(4) Under the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and or any controlled drug
or substance obtained pursuant to a valid prescription, or any other substance, to
a degree which renders the person incapable of safely driving; or
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.450.14 2 1120
(5) Under the influence of any substance ingested, inhaled, or otherwise taken into the
body as prohibited by § 22-42-15.
Section 3. That § 32-23-7 be AMENDED:
32-23-7. In any criminal prosecution for a violation of § 32-23-1 relating to driving
a vehicle while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, a violation of § 22-16-41, or
a violation of § 22-18-36, the amount of alcohol in the defendant's blood at the time
alleged, as shown by chemical analysis of the defendant's blood, breath, or other bodily
substance, gives rise to the following presumptions:
(1) If there was, at that time, five hundredths percent or less by weight of alcohol in
the defendant's blood, it is presumed that the defendant was not under the
influence of an alcoholic beverage;
(2) If there was, at that time, in excess of five hundredths percent but less than eight
hundredths percent by weight of alcohol in the defendant's blood, such fact does
not give rise to any there is no presumption that the defendant was or was not
under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, but such the fact may be considered
with other competent evidence in determining the guilt or innocence of the
defendant; or
(3) If there was, at that time, or as measured within two hours of that time, eight
hundredths percent or more by weight of alcohol in the defendant's blood, it is
presumed that the defendant was under the influence of an alcoholic beverage.
Percent by weight of alcohol in the blood shall be is based upon milligrams of
alcohol per 1.0 cubic centimeter of whole blood, or 2100 cubic centimeters of deep lung
breath.
Section 4. That § 32-23-21 be AMENDED:
32-23-21. It is a Class 2 misdemeanor for any person under the age of twenty-
one to drive, operate, or be in actual physical control of any vehicle:
(1) If there is physical evidence of 0.02 percent or more by weight of alcohol in the
person's blood at the time, or as measured within two hours of the time, of the
driving, operating, or being in actual physical control of the vehicle, as shown by a
chemical analysis of the person's breath, blood, or other bodily substance; or
(2) After having consumed marijuana or any controlled drug or substance, other than
a controlled drug or substance lawfully prescribed for the person, for as long as
physical evidence of the consumption remains present in the person's body.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.450.14 3 1120
If a person is found guilty of or adjudicated for a violation of this section, the Unified
Judicial System shall must notify the Department of Public Safety. Upon conviction or
adjudication, the court shall must suspend that person's driver's license or operating
privilege for a period of thirty days for a first offense, one hundred eighty days for a second
offense, and one year for any third or subsequent offense. The court may, upon proof of
financial responsibility under § 32-35-43.1, issue an order permitting the person to
operate a vehicle for purposes of the person's employment, attendance at school, or
attendance at any counseling program.
Section 5. That § 42-8-45 be AMENDED:
42-8-45. No person may operate a boat, as defined in subdivisions subdivision
42-8-2(2B), (3), (5A), or (6) while underway, on the public waters of the state, while:
(1) There is 0.08 percent or more by weight of alcohol in that the person's blood at
the time, or as measured within two hours of the time, of operating the boat, as
shown by chemical analysis of that the person's breath, blood, or other bodily
substance;
(2) Under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, marijuana, or any controlled drug or
substance not obtained pursuant to a valid prescription, or any combination of an
alcoholic beverage, marijuana, or such controlled drug or substance;
(3) Under the influence of any controlled drug or substance obtained pursuant to a
valid prescription, or any other substance, to a degree which renders the person
incapable of safely driving or operating such boat;
(4) Under the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage and any controlled drug or
substance obtained pursuant to a valid prescription, or any other substance, to a
degree which renders the person incapable of safely driving or operating such boat;
or
(5) Under the influence of any substance ingested, inhaled, or otherwise taken into the
body as prohibited by § 22-42-15.
Any A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.
Section 6. That § 42-8-45.4 be AMENDED:
42-8-45.4. In any criminal prosecution for a violation of § 42-8-45, the amount
of alcohol in the defendant's blood at the time alleged, as shown by chemical analysis of
the defendant's blood, breath, or other bodily substance, gives rise to the following
presumptions:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.450.14 4 1120
(1) If there was, at that time, five hundredths percent or less by weight of alcohol in
the defendant's blood, a presumption arises that the defendant was not under the
influence of an alcoholic beverage;
(2) If there was, at that time, in excess of five hundredths percent but less than eight
hundredths percent by weight of alcohol in the defendant's blood, such fact does
not give rise to any there is no presumption that the defendant was or was not
under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, but such the fact may be considered
with other competent evidence in determining the guilt or innocence of the
defendant; and
(3) If there was, at that time, or as measured within two hours of that time, eight
hundredths percent or more by weight of alcohol in the defendant's blood, a
presumption arises that the defendant was under the influence of an alcoholic
beverage.
Percent by weight of alcohol in the blood is based upon milligrams of alcohol per
1.0 cubic centimeter of whole blood, or 2100 cubic centimeters of deep lung breath.
Section 7. That § 50-13-17 be AMENDED:
50-13-17. It is a Class 1 misdemeanor for any person who is under the influence
of an alcoholic beverage or any drug, or the combined influence of an alcoholic beverage
and any drug to operate an aircraft in the air or on the ground or water. No person may
operate an aircraft in the air or, on the ground, or on water who has while:
(1) There is 0.04 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in that the person's blood at
the time, or as measured within two hours of the time, of operating the aircraft, as
shown by chemical analysis of the person's breath, blood, or other bodily
substance; or
(2) Under the influence of an alcoholic beverage, marijuana, or any controlled drug or
substance not obtained pursuant to a valid prescription, or any combination of an
alcoholic beverage, marijuana, or controlled drug or substance.
A violation of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.